Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 1. In General

§ 3-5-101.
When power of attorney not affected by disability. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1991, ch. 207, § 2; 2005, ch. 161, § 2; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 3, effective January 1, 2018.

§ 3-5-102.
Other powers of attorney not revoked until notice of death or disability. [Repealed]

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; repealed by 2017 ch. 117, § 3, effective January 1, 2018.

§ 3-5-103.
Revocation of power of attorney by recordation.

Unless the power of attorney otherwise specifically provides, any power of attorney executed prior to January 1, 2018 may be revoked either in the same manner as a power of attorney executed on or after January 1, 2018 or by recording an instrument of revocation with a true copy of the power of attorney attached, in the office of the county clerk of the county in which the principal resides. Constructive notice of the revocation is given from and after the date of recording the instrument of revocation.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; Laws 2017, ch. 117, § 2.

The 2017 amendment

, effective January 1, 2018, substituted “executed prior to January 1, 2018 may be revoked either in the same manner as a power of attorney executed on or after January 1, 2018 or by recording” for “executed after the effective date of this act, including but not limited to powers of attorney described in W.S.

3-5-101

or

3-5-102

, may be revoked by recording.”